Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5069.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin PROPERTY TAX EXEMPTION; UNITED WAY OF BEMIDJI AREA.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 272.02, subdivision 38, paragraph (b), and any other law to the contrary, property acquired by the United Way of Bemidji Area on August 1, 2025, is exempt from property taxes payable in 2026. The county assessor must provide the United Way of Bemidji Area with an exemption application for assessment year 2025. The United Way of Bemidji Area must file the application with the county assessor by August 1, 2026, to qualify for the exemption under this section. An amount necessary to make a payment to the county for the property taxes attributable to the exemption is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue in fiscal year 2027. new text end new text begin (b) By August 1, 2026, the auditor of Beltrami County must certify to the commissioner of revenue the amount to be paid by the commissioner of revenue to the county under paragraph (a). The commissioner of revenue must make this payment by August 15, 2026. For any unpaid portion of the tax due on the property in 2026, the county auditor must distribute the payment to local jurisdictions in proportion to the amount of tax levied on the property in paragraph (a) by each jurisdiction for property taxes payable in 2026. The county auditor must also provide a refund of any taxes paid by United Way of Bemidji Area for property taxes payable in 2026 on the property. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end